Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
28-65-221. Standby guardians.

Without surrendering parental rights, any parent who is chronically ill or near death may have a standby guardian appointed by the court for the parent's minor children using the same procedures outlined in this subchapter to establish a guardianship. The standby guardian's authority would take effect as outlined in an order of standby guardianship, upon:

The death of the parent;

The mental incapacity of the parent; or

The physical debilitation and consent of the parent.

The standby guardian shall immediately notify the court upon the death, incapacity, or debilitation of the parent and shall immediately assume the role of guardian of the minor children.

The court shall enter an order of guardianship in conformance with this section.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 331, § 5: Mar. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in enacting legislation prescribing the various categories of securities and accounts in which guardians may invest funds of wards, credit unions insured by the National Credit Union Administration were inadvertently left out; that failure to include the insured credit unions as authorized depositories of such funds has created and continues to create a serious inequity and an unfair advantage for such credit unions; that this act is designed to eliminate this inequity and should be given effect immediately. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

ALR.

Judgment in guardian's final accounting proceedings as res judicata in ward's subsequent action against guardian. 34 A.L.R.4th 1121.

Am. Jur. 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Guar. & W., § 93 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Leflar, Liberty and Death: Advance Health Care Directives and the Law of Arkansas, 39 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

Brantley, Use of the Trust to Manage Property of the Elderly or Disabled, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 619.

C.J.S. 39 C.J.S., Guar. & W., § 51 et seq.

The guardian of the person shall be entitled to the custody of the ward but shall not have the power to bind the ward or his or her property.

To exercise due care to protect and preserve it;

To invest it and apply it as provided in this chapter;

To account for it faithfully;

To perform all other duties required of him or her by law; and

At the termination of the guardianship, to deliver the assets of the ward to the persons entitled to them.

To the extent applicable, the law of trusts shall apply to the duties and liabilities of a guardian of the estate.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Matthew L. Brunson, Family Law—Providing for Those Who Cannot Provide for Themselves: A Proposal for the Arkansas General Assembly to Follow in the Footsteps of an Already Expansive Guardianship Law and Grant Guardians the Right to File for Divorce on Behalf of a Ward, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 271 (2016).

Circuit court properly interpreted subdivision (a)(3) of this section to mean that the asserted limitations were placed upon a guardian of a person only, and not the guardian of an estate, where the statute's plain language stated that the guardian of a person did not have the authority to bind the ward or his property.Carmody v. Raymond James Fin. Servs., 373 Ark. 79, 281 S.W.3d 721 (2008).

A corporation was held as unsuitable to perform the duties of a guardian for the person. Bogan v. Ark. First Nat'l Bank, 249 Ark. 840, 462 S.W.2d 203 (1971) (decision under prior law).

Where the evidence showed that a ward went by her guardian's office each morning on her way to school and got small amounts in cash, ranging from 50 cents to a dollar, that she signed some receipts in blank, and that she did not receive the amounts shown in the several receipts, and that practically all of her estate was disposed of by the guardian in a little more than six months, there was not a substantial compliance with the “due care” provisions of former similar statute by the guardian. Robinson v. Hammons, 228 Ark. 329, 307 S.W.2d 857 (1957) (decision under prior law).

Where defendant also served as a co-executrix of her mother's estate, §28-49-101(b)(2) permitted her to preserve and maintain real property in the estate, but where the title to the real property vested in defendant immediately on her mother's death, the circuit court erred in approving any expenditures for the property made after the mother's death. Monk v. Griffin, 92 Ark. App. 320, 213 S.W.3d 651 (2005).

Trial court did not clearly err in granting a mother's petition to replace a father as guardian of their 21-year-old son, who had Williams syndrome, because the son needed a guardian who was vigilant in ensuring that his needs were met; there were several occasions where the father delayed or denied the son medical attention.Hoffarth v. Harp, 2009 Ark. App. 240, 303 S.W.3d 96 (2009), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Ark. App. LEXIS 684 (May 6, 2009), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Ark. LEXIS 575 (Sept. 10, 2009).

Chapter 7 debtors who were guardians of a creditor had a fiduciary responsibility to the creditor created by subdivision (b)(2) of this section and §28-73-303, and the debtors committed defalcation as fiduciaries by failing to hold the creditor's estate as directed by a court order and by failing to account for estate funds. Any debt that resulted from the debtors'defalcation was therefore nondischargeable under 11 U.S.C.S. § 523(a)(4).Anderson v. Sharp (In re Sharp), — B.R. —, 2008 Bankr. LEXIS 4270 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. Aug. 8, 2008).

Contract agreeing to binding arbitration did not violate public policy where the legislature had made clear in enacting this section that a guardian had a duty to invest the estate's funds and the circuit court properly found that the guardian had authority to execute account forms or client agreements necessary to deposit and invest estate funds.Carmody v. Raymond James Fin. Servs., 373 Ark. 79, 281 S.W.3d 721 (2008).

In light of the public policy favoring arbitration and the Legislature's decision to refrain from specifically limiting a guardian's ability to enter into arbitration agreements, a guardian of a patient's person and the patient's estate possessed the authority to enter into an arbitration agreement with a nursing home on behalf of the patient; therefore, the nursing home's motion to compel arbitration should have been granted.GGNSC Holdings, LLC v. Lamb, 2016 Ark. 101, 487 S.W.3d 348 (2016).

Guardian failed to comply with her statutory responsibilities because she did not perform an inventory, nor did she provide the circuit court with an annual accounting; additionally, the guardian utilized two family bank accounts to pay all expenses.Rogers v. Ritchie, 2017 Ark. App. 420, 528 S.W.3d 272 (2017).

Circuit court erred as a matter of law when it disallowed expenditures a guardian made during the pendency of a ward's guardianship for the benefit of the guardian because it did not consider whether the expenditures were reasonable, necessary, and proper for the care and maintenance of the ward; the guardian was the ward's spouse, and it was her testimony that the ward was the sole financial provider for almost the entirety of their 40-year marriage.Rogers v. Ritchie, 2017 Ark. App. 420, 528 S.W.3d 272 (2017).

Circuit court erred in ruling that money paid for life insurance premiums was an allowable expense of the guardianship because the money expended on the insurance premiums went toward policies on both the guardian's and the ward's lives; the circuit court was directed to consider whether the money expended for the guardian's insurance premiums was proper for the care and maintenance of the ward.Rogers v. Ritchie, 2017 Ark. App. 420, 528 S.W.3d 272 (2017).

Because the guardianship terminated at the ward's death, his funeral expenses were not proper expenses of the guardianship.Rogers v. Ritchie, 2017 Ark. App. 420, 528 S.W.3d 272 (2017).

In a case involving the management of an estate, a trial court erred by determining that certain expenditures of behalf of a ward were improper; the guardian was allowed to make gifts on behalf of the ward under §28-65-308(b), he could continue the ward's practice of supporting family members, continuing donations to the ward's church was acceptable, and expenditures for food and clothing fell within the definition of what was required for maintenance. The law of trusts guided the evaluation of the duties and liabilities of the guardian of an estate.Stautzenberger v. Stautzenberger, 2013 Ark. 148, 427 S.W.3d 17 (2013).

Where former similar statute gave the court appointed guardian the right of custody superior to that of the foster parents, and there was no allegation or proof that any of the prohibited acts were about to be performed by the guardian or the Commissioner of Arkansas Social Services, whom the foster parents sought to prevent from interfering with their adoption proceedings, the chancellor was in error when he issued an injunction against interference with the adoption proceedings of the foster parents. Toan v. Falbo, 268 Ark. 337, 595 S.W.2d 936 (1980) (decision under prior law).

Where a grandmother was the guardian of an incompetent grandchild and the parents of the grandchild forcibly removed the child from the guardian to a location in Kentucky, it was proper for the court to order the return of the child to the grandparent, although she and her husband were over 80 years of age and deteriorating physically, where it was also shown that the father of the child was suffering from advanced stages of emphysema and an asthmatic condition and there was also evidence that the mother was hospitalized for significant health reasons on several different occasions. Mallory v. Edmondson, 257 Ark. 909, 521 S.W.2d 215 (1975) (decision under prior law).

Probate courts were held to have the power to order a guardian of the person to surrender the tax returns of an incompetent ward over to the court for inspection by the guardian of the estate, as well as other parties to the litigation. Ratterree v. White, 277 Ark. 318, 642 S.W.2d 288 (1982) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Brasel v. Estate of Harp, 317 Ark. 379, 877 S.W.2d 923 (1994); Courtyard Gardens Health & Rehab., LLC v. Sheffield, 2016 Ark. 235, 495 S.W.3d 69 (2016).

(1)No guardian appointed prior to October 1, 2001, shall make any of the following decisions without filing a petition and receiving express court approval:

Consent on behalf of the incapacitated person to abortion, sterilization, psychosurgery, or removal of bodily organs except when necessary in a situation threatening the life of the incapacitated;

Consent to withholding life-saving treatment;

Authorize experimental medical procedures;

Authorize termination of parental rights;

Prohibit the incapacitated person from voting;

Prohibit the incapacitated person from obtaining a driver's license; or

Consent to a settlement or compromise of any claim by or against the incapacitated person or his or her estate.

No guardian appointed on or after October 1, 2001, shall make any of the following decisions without filing a petition and receiving express court approval:

Consent on behalf of the incapacitated person to abortion, sterilization, psychosurgery, or removal of bodily organs except when necessary in a situation threatening the life of the incapacitated;

Consent to withholding life-saving treatment;

Authorize experimental medical procedures;

Authorize termination of parental rights;

Authorize an incapacitated person to vote;

Prohibit the incapacitated person from obtaining a driver's license; or

Consent to a settlement or compromise of any claim by or against the incapacitated person or his or her estate.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Probate Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 631.

Matthew L. Brunson, Family Law—Providing for Those Who Cannot Provide for Themselves: A Proposal for the Arkansas General Assembly to Follow in the Footsteps of an Already Expansive Guardianship Law and Grant Guardians the Right to File for Divorce on Behalf of a Ward, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 271 (2016).

A guardian is authorized to employ legal counsel in connection with the discharge of his duties, and the hiring of an attorney is not among those decisions made by a guardian that always requires prior court approval. Johnson v. Guardianship of Ratcliff, 72 Ark. App. 85, 34 S.W.3d 749 (2000).

Subdivision (a)(1)(G) of this section did not apply where the guardian, in signing the investment agreements, did not consent to a settlement or compromise, the claims subject to the arbitration agreement that the guardian had signed had yet to be decided, and thus, no settlement or compromise existed.Carmody v. Raymond James Fin. Servs., 373 Ark. 79, 281 S.W.3d 721 (2008).

Changing the ward's residence is not among the statutory list of guardian decisions that always require prior court approval. King v. Beavers, 148 F.3d 1031 (8th Cir. 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 1002, 119 S. Ct. 513 (1998).

Probate courts are courts of limited and specific jurisdiction, and they have only the powers conferred by the Constitution or by statute or powers necessarily incidental to those specifically granted. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Estate of Hogan, 314 Ark. 19, 858 S.W.2d 105 (1993).

However, the provisions of subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall not apply to written requests under § 20-17-214.

(1)If the ward is incapacitated for reasons other than minority and has not been committed to the state hospital as otherwise provided by law, the court, upon petition of the guardian of the person or other interested person and after such notice as the court shall direct, including notice to the guardian of the person if he or she is not the petitioner, may authorize or direct the guardian of the person to take appropriate action for the commitment of the ward to the state hospital or, while retaining control over and responsibility for the care of the person of the ward, to place the ward in some other suitable institution for treatment, care, or safekeeping.

If the condition of the ward is such as to endanger the person or property of himself or herself or others, the guardian, in an emergency, may temporarily confine the ward in some suitable place or may deliver him or her into the custody of the sheriff for safekeeping in the county jail until such time as the court may hear and act upon a petition, which shall be promptly filed by the guardian, with reference to the commitment of the ward to the state hospital or for other appropriate provision for his or her treatment, care, or safekeeping.

Where hospital authorities rightfully received an insane person into their custody, a court would not require the absolute discharge from such custody, so long as no steps were taken under former similar statute for his care and custody. Ex parte Smith, 167 Ark. 80, 266 S.W. 950 (1924) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 517, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Powers and Duties

28-65-301. Duties of guardians generally.

(1)It shall be the duty of the guardian of the person, consistent with and out of the resources of the ward's estate, to care for and maintain the ward and, if he or she is a minor, to see that he or she is protected, properly trained and educated, and that he or she has the opportunity to learn a trade, occupation, or profession.

The guardian of the person may be required to report the condition of his or her ward to the court, at regular intervals or otherwise, as the court may direct.

(1)It shall be the duty of the guardian of the estate:

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, §§ 25, 26; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 57-844, 57-845; Acts 1999, No. 517, § 2.

28-65-302. Decisions requiring court approval.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-845; Acts 1999, No. 1536, § 7; 2001, No. 1689, § 1.

28-65-303. Care, treatment, and confinement of ward.

Upon petition of the guardian or other interested person, after a hearing of which the guardian of the person and such other persons as the court may direct shall have notice, the court, for good cause shown, may modify, amend, or revoke such an order.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-845.

28-65-304. Title and possession of estate.

The guardian of the estate shall take possession of all of the ward's real and personal property, and of rents, income, issue, and of the proceeds arising from the sale, mortgage, lease, or exchange thereof. Subject to the possession, the title to all the estate and to the increment and proceeds of the estate shall be in the ward and not in the guardian.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-846.

Cross References. Taxes on lands, liability for, §§26-35-301,26-35-401.